Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.88.030

General laws applicable.

General laws relating to harbor areas within cities, including but not limited to, chapter 36.08 RCW relating to transfer of territory lying in two or more counties; *RCW 79.92.110 relating to disposition of rental from leasehold in the harbor areas; and RCW 88.32.240 and 88.32.250 relating to joint planning by cities and counties shall apply to, benefit and obligate code cities to the same extent as such general laws apply to any class of city.

[ 1985 c 7 s 103; 1983 c 3 s 75; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.88.030.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 79.92.110 was recodified as RCW 79.115.150 pursuant to 2005 c 155 s 1006.